Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1954
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Step
Up to Quality Child Care Act:

(1) Applicable
child care and early childhood education programs include:

(a) Child care
programs licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act which serve children
from birth to kindergarten-entrance age;

(b) Prekindergarten services and prekindergarten
programs established pursuant to section 79-1104; and

(c) The federal Head Start
programs, 42 U.S.C. 9831 et seq., and Early Head Start programs, 42 U.S.C.
9840a; and

(2) Fiscal year means the fiscal year of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 3.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.